Massachusetts, session 194th, H4763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all acts and
proceedings taken by the town of Bourne at the annual town election held on May 20, 2025 and
all actions taken pursuant thereto are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed, notwithstanding
any failure to include the form of the proposition two and one-half, so-called, debt exclusion
question in the posted warrants for said election.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1